New York, session 2025-2026, S7315.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 95 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 12 to read as follows: 3 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and to 4 the extent not inconsistent with federal law and regulations, the 5 department shall, within ninety days after the effective date of this 6 subdivision, apply for a waiver or request authorization from the feder- 7 al government to ensure that supplemental nutrition assistance program 8 (SNAP) benefits are able to be used for menstrual products including, 9 but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons and panty liners. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that section one 11 of this act shall take effect only upon the occurrence of the waiver or 12 authorization from the federal government provided for in such section; 13 provided further that the office of temporary and disability assistance 14 shall notify the legislative bill drafting commission upon the occur- 15 rence of such waiver or authorization in order that the commission may 16 maintain an accurate and timely effective data base of the official text 17 of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance of effectuating the 18 provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the 19 public officers law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11609-01-5